Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.170

Direct petition method is alternative.

The method of annexation provided for in RCW 35.13.130 to 35.13.160 shall be an alternative method, not superseding any other.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.13.170. Prior: 1945 c 128 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 8908-15.]